Minnesota, session 2025-2026, HF3113.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MINNESOTA: ARTICLE 1 ADMINISTRATIVE PROCEDURE Section 1. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 14.02, subdivision 4, is amended to read: Subd. 4. Rule. "Rule" means every agency statement of general applicability and future effect, including amendments, suspensions, and repeals of rules, adopted to implement or make specific the law enforced or administered by that agency or to govern its organization or procedure.new text begin A requirement in an agency guidance document is not a rule unless adopted following procedures required for adoption of a rule.new text end new text begin EFFECTIVE DATE. new text end new text begin This section is effective the day following final enactment for rules for which a notice of intent to adopt a rule without public hearing under Minnesota Statutes, section 14.22, subdivision 1, paragraph (a), 14.389, subdivision 2, or 14.3895, subdivision 3; a dual notice under Minnesota Statutes, section 14.22, subdivision 2; or a notice of hearing on a proposed rule under Minnesota Statutes, section 14.14, was published before May 1, 2025. new text end Sec. 2. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 14.05, subdivision 1, is amended to read: Subdivision 1. Authority to adopt original rules restricted. Each agency shall adopt, amend, suspend, or repeal its rules in accordance with the procedures specified in sections 14.001 to 14.69, and only pursuant to authority delegated by deleted text begin lawdeleted text end new text begin statutenew text end and in full compliance with its duties and obligations. If a law authorizing rules is repealed, the rules adopted pursuant to that law are automatically repealed on the effective date of the law's repeal unless there is another law authorizing the rules. Except as provided in section 14.06, sections 14.001 to 14.69 shall not be authority for an agency to adopt, amend, suspend, or repeal rules. new text begin EFFECTIVE DATE. new text end new text begin This section is effective the day following final enactment for rules for which a notice of intent to adopt a rule without public hearing under Minnesota Statutes, section 14.22, subdivision 1, paragraph (a), 14.389, subdivision 2, or 14.3895, subdivision 3; a dual notice under Minnesota Statutes, section 14.22, subdivision 2; or a notice of hearing on a proposed rule under Minnesota Statutes, section 14.14, was published before May 1, 2025. new text end Sec. 3. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 14.131, is amended to read: 14.131 STATEMENT OF NEED AND REASONABLENESS. By the date of the section 14.14, subdivision 1a, notice, the agency must prepare, review, and make available for public review a statement of the need for and reasonableness of the rule. The statement of need and reasonableness must be prepared under rules adopted by the chief administrative law judge and must include the following to the extent the agency, through reasonable effort, can ascertain this information: (1) a description of the classes of persons who probably will be affected by the proposed rule, including classes that will bear the costs of the proposed rule and classes that will benefit from the proposed rule; (2) the probable costs to the agency and to any other agency of the implementation and enforcement of the proposed rule and any anticipated effect on state revenues; (3) a determination of whether there are less costly methods or less intrusive methods for achieving the purpose of the proposed rule; (4) a description of any alternative methods for achieving the purpose of the proposed rule that were seriously considered by the agency and the reasons why they were rejected in favor of the proposed rulenew text begin , and where the rule incorporates a third-party standard by reference, this description must include an explanation of why the third-party's standard is the method of enforcing the relevant statute that imposes the least burden on the entity subject to the statute and rulenew text end ; (5) the probable costs of complying with the proposed rule, including the portion of the total costs that will be borne by identifiable categories of affected parties, such as separate classes of governmental units, businesses, or individuals; (6) the probable costs or consequences of not adopting the proposed rule, including those costs or consequences borne by identifiable categories of affected parties, such as separate classes of government units, businesses, or individuals; (7) an assessment of any differences between the proposed rule and existing federal regulations and a specific analysis of the need for and reasonableness of each difference; and (8) an assessment of the cumulative effect of the rule with other federal and state regulations related to the specific purpose of the rule. The statement must describe how the agency, in developing the rules, considered and implemented the legislative policy supporting performance-based regulatory systems set forth in section 14.002. For purposes of clause (8), "cumulative effect" means the impact that results from incremental impact of the proposed rule in addition to other rules, regardless of what state or federal agency has adopted the other rules. Cumulative effects can result from individually minor but collectively significant rules adopted over a period of time. The statement must also describe the agency's efforts to provide additional notification under section 14.14, subdivision 1a, to persons or classes of persons who may be affected by the proposed rule or must explain why these efforts were not made. The agency must consult with the commissioner of management and budget to help evaluate the fiscal impact and fiscal benefits of the proposed rule on units of local government. The agency must send a copy of the statement of need and reasonableness to the Legislative Reference Library when the notice of hearing is mailed under section 14.14, subdivision 1a. new text begin EFFECTIVE DATE. new text end new text begin This section is effective the day following final enactment for rules for which a notice of intent to adopt a rule without public hearing under Minnesota Statutes, section 14.22, subdivision 1, paragraph (a), 14.389, subdivision 2, or 14.3895, subdivision 3; a dual notice under Minnesota Statutes, section 14.22, subdivision 2; or a notice of hearing on a proposed rule under Minnesota Statutes, section 14.14, was published before May 1, 2025. new text end Sec. 4. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 14.365, is amended to read: 14.365 OFFICIAL RULEMAKING RECORD. The agency shall maintain the official rulemaking record for every rule adopted under sections 14.05 to 14.389. The record must be available for public inspection. The record required by this section constitutes the official and exclusive agency rulemaking record with respect to agency action on or judicial review of the rule. The record must contain: (1) copies of all publications in the State Register pertaining to the rule; (2) all written petitions, and all requests, submissions, or comments received by the agency or the administrative law judge after publication of the notice of intent to adopt or the notice of hearing in the State Register pertaining to the rule; (3) the statement of need and reasonableness for the rule; (4) the official transcript of the hearing if one was held, or the tape recording of the hearing if a transcript was not prepared; (5) the report of the administrative law judge, if any; (6) the rule in the form last submitted to the administrative law judge under sections 14.14 to 14.20 or first submitted to the administrative law judge under sections 14.22 to 14.28; (7) the administrative law judge's written statement of required modifications and of approval or disapproval by the chief administrative law judge, if any; (8) any documents required by applicable rules of the Office of Administrative Hearings; (9) the agency's order adopting the rulenew text begin , including an identification of the statutory authority that delegated authority to the agency to adopt the rulenew text end ; (10) the revisor's certificate approving the form of the rule; and (11) a copy of the adopted rule as filed with the secretary of state. new text begin EFFECTIVE DATE. new text end new text begin This section is effective the day following final enactment for rules for which a notice of intent to adopt a rule without public hearing under Minnesota Statutes, section 14.22, subdivision 1, paragraph (a), 14.389, subdivision 2, or 14.3895, subdivision 3; a dual notice under Minnesota Statutes, section 14.22, subdivision 2; or a notice of hearing on a proposed rule under Minnesota Statutes, section 14.14, was published before May 1, 2025. new text end Sec. 5. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 14.366, is amended to read: 14.366 PUBLIC RULEMAKING DOCKET. (a) Each agency shall maintain a current, public rulemaking docket. (b) The rulemaking docket must contain a listing of the precise subject matter of each possible proposed rule currently under active consideration within the agency for proposal, the name and address of agency personnel with whom persons may communicate with respect to the matter, and an indication of its present status within the agency. (c) The rulemaking docket must list each pending rulemaking proceeding. A rulemaking proceeding is pending from the time it is begun, by publication of the notice of solicitation, the notice of intent to adopt, or notice of hearing, to the time it is terminated, by publication of a notice of withdrawal or the rule becoming effective. For each rulemaking proceeding, the docket must indicate: (1) the subject matter of the proposed rule; (2) a citation to all published notices relating to the proceeding; (3) where written comments on the proposed rule may be inspected; (4) the time during which written comments may be made; (5) the names of persons who have made written requests for a public hearing, where those requests may be inspected, and where and when the hearing will be held; (6) the current status of the proposed rule and any agency determinations with respect to the rule; (7) any known timetable for agency decisions or other action in the proceeding; (8) the date of the rule's adoption; (9) the date the rule was filed with the secretary of state; deleted text begin anddeleted text end (10) when the rule will become effectivenew text begin ; andnew text end new text begin (11) the statutory authority for adoption of the rulenew text end . new text begin EFFECTIVE DATE. new text end new text begin This section is effective the day following final enactment for rules for which a notice of intent to adopt a rule without public hearing under Minnesota Statutes, section 14.22, subdivision 1, paragraph (a), 14.389, subdivision 2, or 14.3895, subdivision 3; a dual notice under Minnesota Statutes, section 14.22, subdivision 2; or a notice of hearing on a proposed rule under Minnesota Statutes, section 14.14, was published before May 1, 2025. new text end Sec. 6. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 14.37, is amended by adding a subdivision to read: new text begin Subd. 3. new text end new text begin Statutory authority. new text end new text begin Any electronic or printed publication of a rule by the revisor of statutes must include a field that identifies the statutory authority for the rule. new text end Sec. 7. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 14.44, is amended to read: 14.44 DETERMINATION OF VALIDITY OF RULE. The validity of any rule may be determined upon the petition for a declaratory judgment thereon, addressed to the court of appeals, when it appears that the rule, or its threatened application, interferes with or impairs, or threatens to interfere with or impair the legal rights or privileges of the petitioner. The agency shall be made a party to the proceeding. The declaratory judgment may be rendered whether or not the petitioner has first requested the agency to pass upon the validity of the rule in question, and whether or not the agency has commenced an action against the petitioner to enforce the rule.new text begin The court shall not defer to the agency's interpretation.new text end new text begin EFFECTIVE DATE. new text end new text begin This section is effective the day following final enactment and applies to petitions filed on or after that date. new text end Sec. 8. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 14.69, is amended to read: 14.69 SCOPE OF JUDICIAL REVIEW. In a judicial review under sections 14.63 to 14.68, the court may affirm the decision of the agency or remand the case for further proceedings; or it may reverse or modify the decision if the substantial rights of the petitioners may have been prejudiced because the administrative finding, inferences, conclusion, or decisions are: (a) in violation of constitutional provisions; or (b) in excess of the statutory authority or jurisdiction of the agency; or (c) made upon unlawful procedure; or (d) affected by other error of law; or (e) unsupported by substantial evidence in view of the entire record as submitted; or (f) arbitrary or capricious. new text begin In making a determination under this section, the court shall not defer to the agency's interpretation. new text end new text begin EFFECTIVE DATE. new text end new text begin This section is effective the day following final enactment and applies to petitions filed on or after that date. new text end ARTICLE 2 RESCINDING STATUTORY AUTHORITY FOR RULEMAKING ON GOVERNOR'S ORDERS Section 1. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 12.21, subdivision 3, is amended to read: Subd. 3. Specific authority. new text begin (a) new text end In performing duties under this chapter and to effect its policy and purpose, the governor may: (1) make, amend, and rescind the necessary orders deleted text begin and rulesdeleted text end to carry out the provisions of this chapter and section 216C.15 within the limits of the authority conferred by this section, with due consideration of the plans of the federal government and without complying with sections 14.001 to 14.69, but no order or rule has the effect of law except as provided by section 12.32; (2) ensure that a comprehensive emergency operations plan and emergency management program for this state are developed and maintained, and are integrated into and coordinated with the emergency plans of the federal government and of other states to the fullest possible extent; (3) in accordance with the emergency operations plan and the emergency management program of this state, procure supplies, equipment, and facilities; institute training programs and public information programs; and take all other preparatory steps, including the partial or full activation of emergency management organizations in advance of actual disaster to ensure the furnishing of adequately trained and equipped forces of emergency management personnel in time of need; (4) make studies and surveys of the industries, resources, and facilities in this state as may be necessary to ascertain the capabilities of the state for emergency management and to plan for the most efficient emergency use of those industries, resources, and facilities; (5) on behalf of this state, enter into mutual aid arrangements or cooperative agreements with other states, tribal authorities, and Canadian provinces, and coordinate mutual aid plans between political subdivisions of this state; (6) delegate administrative authority vested in the governor under this chapter, except the power to make rules, and provide for the subdelegation of that authority; (7) cooperate with the president and the heads of the armed forces, the Emergency Management Agency of the United States and other appropriate federal officers and agencies, and with the officers and agencies of other states in matters pertaining to the emergency management of the state and nation, including the direction or control of: (i) emergency preparedness drills and exercises; (ii) warnings and signals for drills or actual emergencies and the mechanical devices to be used in connection with them; (iii) shutting off water mains, gas mains, electric power connections and the suspension of all other utility services; (iv) the conduct of persons in the state, including entrance or exit from any stricken or threatened public place, occupancy of facilities, and the movement and cessation of movement of pedestrians, vehicular traffic, and all forms of private and public transportation during, prior, and subsequent to drills or actual emergencies; (v) public meetings or gatherings; and (vi) the evacuation, reception, and sheltering of persons; (8) contribute to a political subdivision, within the limits of the appropriation for that purpose, not more than 25 percent of the cost of acquiring organizational equipment that meets standards established by the governor; (9) formulate and execute, with the approval of the Executive Council, plans and rules for the control of traffic in order to provide for the rapid and safe movement over public highways and streets of troops, vehicles of a military nature, and materials for national defense and war or for use in any war industry, for the conservation of critical materials, or for emergency management purposes; and coordinate the activities of the departments or agencies of the state and its political subdivisions concerned directly or indirectly with public highways and streets, in a manner that will best effectuate those plans; (10) alter or adjust by executive order, without complying with sections 14.01 to 14.69, the working hours, workdays and work week of, and annual and sick leave provisions and payroll laws regarding all state employees in the executive branch as the governor deems necessary to minimize the impact of the disaster or emergency, conforming the alterations or adjustments to existing state laws, rules, and collective bargaining agreements to the extent practicable; (11) authorize the commissioner of education to alter school schedules, curtail school activities, or order schools closed as defined in section 120A.05, subdivisions 9, 11, 13, and 17, and including charter schools under chapter 124E, and elementary schools enrolling prekindergarten pupils in district programs; and (12) transfer the direction, personnel, or functions of state agencies to perform or facilitate response and recovery programs. new text begin (b) Nothing in this section authorizes the governor to authorize an agency to adopt rules. new text end new text begin EFFECTIVE DATE. new text end new text begin This section is effective the day following final enactment for rules for which a notice of intent to adopt a rule without public hearing under Minnesota Statutes, section 14.22, subdivision 1, paragraph (a), 14.389, subdivision 2, or 14.3895, subdivision 3; a dual notice under Minnesota Statutes, section 14.22, subdivision 2; or a notice of hearing on a proposed rule under Minnesota Statutes, section 14.14, was published before May 1, 2025. new text end